dictionaries/sr/sr-Latn.aff
SET UTF-8

KEY ljnjertzuiopšđž|asdfghjklčć|sdžcvbnm|ljanjsedrftghujikolpč|azsdždcfvgbhdžnjmk|ščć|đćž
FLAG num
WORDCHARS .

SFX 1 Y 7
SFX 1 a a
SFX 1 a e
SFX 1 a i
SFX 1 a u
SFX 1 a o
SFX 1 a om
SFX 1 a ama

SFX 2 Y 7
SFX 2 r r
SFX 2 r ra
SFX 2 r ru
SFX 2 r re
SFX 2 r rom
SFX 2 r ri
SFX 2 r rima

SFX 3 Y 7
SFX 3 s s
SFX 3 s sa
SFX 3 s su
SFX 3 s se
SFX 3 s som
SFX 3 s si
SFX 3 s sima

SFX 4 Y 7
SFX 4 a a
SFX 4 a ama
SFX 4 a e
SFX 4 a i
SFX 4 a o
SFX 4 a om
SFX 4 a u

SFX 5 Y 8
SFX 5 k k
SFX 5 k ka
SFX 5 k ku
SFX 5 k če
SFX 5 k kom
SFX 5 k ci
SFX 5 k cima
SFX 5 k ke

SFX 6 Y 5
SFX 6 e a
SFX 6 e e
SFX 6 e em
SFX 6 e ima
SFX 6 e u

SFX 7 Y 7
SFX 7 n n
SFX 7 n na
SFX 7 n nu
SFX 7 n ne
SFX 7 n nom
SFX 7 n ni
SFX 7 n nima

SFX 8 Y 7
SFX 8 v v
SFX 8 v va
SFX 8 v vu
SFX 8 v ve
SFX 8 v vom
SFX 8 v vi
SFX 8 v vima

SFX 9 Y 4
SFX 9 st st
SFX 9 st sti
SFX 9 st stima
SFX 9 st šću

SFX 10 Y 7
SFX 10 r r
SFX 10 r ra
SFX 10 r re
SFX 10 r ri
SFX 10 r rima
SFX 10 r rom
SFX 10 r ru

SFX 11 Y 8
SFX 11 r r
SFX 11 r ra
SFX 11 r ru
SFX 11 r re
SFX 11 r rem
SFX 11 r rom
SFX 11 r ri
SFX 11 r rima

SFX 12 Y 7
SFX 12 j j
SFX 12 j ja
SFX 12 j ju
SFX 12 j je
SFX 12 j jem
SFX 12 j ji
SFX 12 j jima

SFX 13 Y 7
SFX 13 m m
SFX 13 m ma
SFX 13 m mu
SFX 13 m me
SFX 13 m mom
SFX 13 m mi
SFX 13 m mima

SFX 14 Y 9
SFX 14 ac ac
SFX 14 ac aca
SFX 14 ac acu
SFX 14 ac ače
SFX 14 ac acem
SFX 14 ac aci
SFX 14 ac aca
SFX 14 ac acima
SFX 14 ac ace

SFX 15 Y 8
SFX 15 am am
SFX 15 am ma
SFX 15 am mu
SFX 15 am me
SFX 15 am mom
SFX 15 am mi
SFX 15 am ama
SFX 15 am mima

SFX 16 Y 7
SFX 16 l l
SFX 16 l la
SFX 16 l lu
SFX 16 l le
SFX 16 l lom
SFX 16 l li
SFX 16 l lima

SFX 17 Y 8
SFX 17 t t
SFX 17 t ta
SFX 17 t tu
SFX 17 t te
SFX 17 t tom
SFX 17 t ti
SFX 17 t ata
SFX 17 t tima

SFX 18 Y 7
SFX 18 t t
SFX 18 t ta
SFX 18 t tu
SFX 18 t te
SFX 18 t tom
SFX 18 t ti
SFX 18 t tima

SFX 20 Y 8
SFX 20 t t
SFX 20 t ta
SFX 20 t tu
SFX 20 t to
SFX 20 t te
SFX 20 t tom
SFX 20 t ti
SFX 20 t tima

SFX 21 Y 9
SFX 21 ac ac
SFX 21 ac ca
SFX 21 ac cu
SFX 21 ac če
SFX 21 ac cem
SFX 21 ac ci
SFX 21 ac aca
SFX 21 ac cima
SFX 21 ac ce

SFX 22 Y 9
SFX 22 ac ac
SFX 22 ac ca
SFX 22 ac cu
SFX 22 ac če
SFX 22 ac com
SFX 22 ac ci
SFX 22 ac aca
SFX 22 ac cima
SFX 22 ac ce

SFX 23 Y 7
SFX 23 z z
SFX 23 z zu
SFX 23 z za
SFX 23 z ze
SFX 23 z zom
SFX 23 z zi
SFX 23 z zima

SFX 24 Y 7
SFX 24 s s
SFX 24 s su
SFX 24 s sa
SFX 24 s se
SFX 24 s som
SFX 24 s si
SFX 24 s sima

SFX 25 Y 6
SFX 25 a a
SFX 25 a ama
SFX 25 a e
SFX 25 a i
SFX 25 a om
SFX 25 a u

SFX 26 Y 8
SFX 26 e e
SFX 26 e eta
SFX 26 e etu
SFX 26 e etom
SFX 26 e ići
SFX 26 e ića
SFX 26 e ićima
SFX 26 e iće

SFX 27 Y 7
SFX 27 s s
SFX 27 s sa
SFX 27 s su
SFX 27 s som
SFX 27 s si
SFX 27 s sima
SFX 27 s se

SFX 28 Y 3
SFX 28 t t
SFX 28 t ti
SFX 28 t tima

SFX 29 Y 7
SFX 29 ka ka
SFX 29 ka kama
SFX 29 ka ke
SFX 29 ka ci
SFX 29 ka ko
SFX 29 ka kom
SFX 29 ka ku

SFX 30 Y 5
SFX 30 o o
SFX 30 o a
SFX 30 o u
SFX 30 o om
SFX 30 o ima

SFX 31 Y 8
SFX 31 ta ta
SFX 31 ta te
SFX 31 ta ti
SFX 31 ta tu
SFX 31 ta to
SFX 31 ta tom
SFX 31 ta tama
SFX 31 ta ata

SFX 32 Y 8
SFX 32 g g
SFX 32 g ga
SFX 32 g gu
SFX 32 g že
SFX 32 g gom
SFX 32 g zi
SFX 32 g zima
SFX 32 g ge

SFX 33 Y 6
SFX 33 vo vo
SFX 33 vo va
SFX 33 vo vu
SFX 33 vo vom
SFX 33 vo ava
SFX 33 vo vima

SFX 34 Y 7
SFX 34 d d
SFX 34 d da
SFX 34 d du
SFX 34 d de
SFX 34 d dom
SFX 34 d di
SFX 34 d dima

SFX 35 Y 7
SFX 35 ć ć
SFX 35 ć ća
SFX 35 ć će
SFX 35 ć ćem
SFX 35 ć ći
SFX 35 ć ćima
SFX 35 ć ću

SFX 36 Y 9
SFX 36 k k
SFX 36 k ka
SFX 36 k ku
SFX 36 k če
SFX 36 k kom
SFX 36 k kovi
SFX 36 k kova
SFX 36 k kovima
SFX 36 k kove

SFX 37 Y 7
SFX 37 z z
SFX 37 z za
SFX 37 z zu
SFX 37 z ze
SFX 37 z zom
SFX 37 z zi
SFX 37 z zima

SFX 38 Y 7
SFX 38 j j
SFX 38 j ja
SFX 38 j ju
SFX 38 j jem
SFX 38 j ji
SFX 38 j jima
SFX 38 j je

SFX 39 Y 9
SFX 39 ak ak
SFX 39 ak ka
SFX 39 ak ku
SFX 39 ak če
SFX 39 ak kom
SFX 39 ak ci
SFX 39 ak aka
SFX 39 ak cima
SFX 39 ak ke

SFX 40 Y 7
SFX 40 i i
SFX 40 i ija
SFX 40 i iju
SFX 40 i ijem
SFX 40 i iji
SFX 40 i ijima
SFX 40 i ije

SFX 41 Y 8
SFX 41 ar ar
SFX 41 ar ra
SFX 41 ar ru
SFX 41 ar re
SFX 41 ar rom
SFX 41 ar ri
SFX 41 ar ara
SFX 41 ar rima

SFX 42 Y 7
SFX 42 p p
SFX 42 p pa
SFX 42 p pu
SFX 42 p pe
SFX 42 p pom
SFX 42 p pi
SFX 42 p pima

SFX 43 Y 7
SFX 43 c c
SFX 43 c ca
SFX 43 c cu
SFX 43 c ce
SFX 43 c com
SFX 43 c ci
SFX 43 c cima

SFX 44 Y 7
SFX 44 b b
SFX 44 b ba
SFX 44 b bu
SFX 44 b be
SFX 44 b bom
SFX 44 b bi
SFX 44 b bima

SFX 45 Y 9
SFX 45 d d
SFX 45 d da
SFX 45 d du
SFX 45 d de
SFX 45 d dom
SFX 45 d dovi
SFX 45 d dova
SFX 45 d dovima
SFX 45 d dove

SFX 46 Y 6
SFX 46 o o
SFX 46 o a
SFX 46 o u
SFX 46 o om
SFX 46 o ima
SFX 46 o e

SFX 47 Y 3
SFX 47 e e
SFX 47 e i
SFX 47 e ama

SFX 48 Y 7
SFX 48 f f
SFX 48 f fa
SFX 48 f fu
SFX 48 f fe
SFX 48 f fom
SFX 48 f fi
SFX 48 f fima

SFX 49 Y 13
SFX 49 s s
SFX 49 s sa
SFX 49 s su
SFX 49 s se
SFX 49 s som
SFX 49 s sovi
SFX 49 s sova
SFX 49 s sovima
SFX 49 s sove
SFX 49 s sevi
SFX 49 s seva
SFX 49 s sevima
SFX 49 s seve

SFX 50 Y 7
SFX 50 č č
SFX 50 č ča
SFX 50 č ču
SFX 50 č čem
SFX 50 č či
SFX 50 č čima
SFX 50 č če

SFX 51 Y 9
SFX 51 b b
SFX 51 b ba
SFX 51 b bu
SFX 51 b be
SFX 51 b bom
SFX 51 b bovi
SFX 51 b bova
SFX 51 b bovima
SFX 51 b bove

SFX 52 Y 7
SFX 52 j j
SFX 52 j ja
SFX 52 j ju
SFX 52 j je
SFX 52 j jom
SFX 52 j ji
SFX 52 j jima

SFX 53 Y 5
SFX 53 e e
SFX 53 e a
SFX 53 e u
SFX 53 e em
SFX 53 e ima

SFX 54 Y 8
SFX 54 va va
SFX 54 va vama
SFX 54 va ve
SFX 54 va vi
SFX 54 va vo
SFX 54 va vom
SFX 54 va vu
SFX 54 va ava

SFX 55 Y 7
SFX 55 io i
SFX 55 io ija
SFX 55 io iju
SFX 55 io ijem
SFX 55 io iji
SFX 55 io ijima
SFX 55 io ije

SFX 56 Y 7
SFX 56 h h
SFX 56 h ha
SFX 56 h hu
SFX 56 h he
SFX 56 h hom
SFX 56 h si
SFX 56 h sima

SFX 57 Y 8
SFX 57 ka ka
SFX 57 ka kama
SFX 57 ka ke
SFX 57 ka ki
SFX 57 ka ci
SFX 57 ka ko
SFX 57 ka kom
SFX 57 ka ku

SFX 58 Y 8
SFX 58 c c
SFX 58 c ca
SFX 58 c cu
SFX 58 c com
SFX 58 c covi
SFX 58 c cova
SFX 58 c covima
SFX 58 c cove

SFX 59 Y 7
SFX 59 e e
SFX 59 e ea
SFX 59 e eu
SFX 59 e eom
SFX 59 e ei
SFX 59 e eima
SFX 59 e ee

SFX 60 Y 8
SFX 60 at at
SFX 60 at ta
SFX 60 at tu
SFX 60 at te
SFX 60 at tom
SFX 60 at ti
SFX 60 at ata
SFX 60 at tima

SFX 61 Y 8
SFX 61 k k
SFX 61 k ka
SFX 61 k ku
SFX 61 k kom
SFX 61 k kovi
SFX 61 k kova
SFX 61 k kovima
SFX 61 k kove

SFX 62 Y 7
SFX 62 š š
SFX 62 š ša
SFX 62 š šu
SFX 62 š šem
SFX 62 š ši
SFX 62 š šima
SFX 62 š še

SFX 63 Y 8
SFX 63 h h
SFX 63 h ha
SFX 63 h hu
SFX 63 h hom
SFX 63 h hovi
SFX 63 h hova
SFX 63 h hovima
SFX 63 h hove

SFX 64 Y 9
SFX 64 l l
SFX 64 l la
SFX 64 l lu
SFX 64 l le
SFX 64 l lom
SFX 64 l lovi
SFX 64 l lovima
SFX 64 l lova
SFX 64 l love

SFX 65 Y 9
SFX 65 t t
SFX 65 t ta
SFX 65 t tu
SFX 65 t te
SFX 65 t tom
SFX 65 t tovi
SFX 65 t tova
SFX 65 t tovima
SFX 65 t tove

SFX 66 Y 4
SFX 66 o o
SFX 66 o a
SFX 66 o u
SFX 66 o om

SFX 67 Y 9
SFX 67 t t
SFX 67 t ta
SFX 67 t te
SFX 67 t tova
SFX 67 t tovi
SFX 67 t tovima
SFX 67 t tove
SFX 67 t tom
SFX 67 t tu

SFX 68 Y 9
SFX 68 f f
SFX 68 f fa
SFX 68 f fu
SFX 68 f fe
SFX 68 f fom
SFX 68 f fovi
SFX 68 f fova
SFX 68 f fovima
SFX 68 f fove

SFX 69 Y 9
SFX 69 m m
SFX 69 m ma
SFX 69 m mu
SFX 69 m me
SFX 69 m mom
SFX 69 m movi
SFX 69 m mova
SFX 69 m movima
SFX 69 m move

SFX 70 Y 7
SFX 70 š š
SFX 70 š ša
SFX 70 š šu
SFX 70 š še
SFX 70 š šem
SFX 70 š ši
SFX 70 š šima

SFX 71 Y 5
SFX 71 e e
SFX 71 e a
SFX 71 e u
SFX 71 e om
SFX 71 e ima

SFX 72 Y 9
SFX 72 in in
SFX 72 in ina
SFX 72 in inu
SFX 72 in ine
SFX 72 in inom
SFX 72 in i
SFX 72 in a
SFX 72 in ima
SFX 72 in e

SFX 73 Y 9
SFX 73 zac zac
SFX 73 zac sca
SFX 73 zac scu
SFX 73 zac šče
SFX 73 zac scem
SFX 73 zac sci
SFX 73 zac zaca
SFX 73 zac scima
SFX 73 zac sce

SFX 74 Y 7
SFX 74 o o
SFX 74 o la
SFX 74 o lu
SFX 74 o le
SFX 74 o lom
SFX 74 o li
SFX 74 o lima

SFX 75 Y 8
SFX 75 l l
SFX 75 l la
SFX 75 l lu
SFX 75 l le
SFX 75 l lom
SFX 75 l li
SFX 75 l ala
SFX 75 l lima
